South Dakota, session 2026, HB1085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 58-17:
A policy of health insurance subject to this chapter and delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state, may not deny coverage of a nonopioid prescription drug
in favor of an opioid prescription drug if a licensed physician or other authorized health
care practitioner has prescribed a nonopioid drug for the treatment of pain.
A health insurer may not, for a clinically appropriate nonopioid drug, establish prior
authorization requirements, step therapy requirements, or other utilization controls, that
are more restrictive or extensive than the least restrictive or extensive requirements or
controls applicable to any clinically appropriate opioid or narcotic drug or other controlled
substance.
If a health insurer maintains a formulary that groups prescription drugs into tiers
for the purpose of cost sharing, the insurer may not place any nonopioid drugs on a tier
with a cost sharing responsibility that exceeds the lowest cost sharing responsibility
required for any opioid or narcotic drug.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.